src/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc
!LEXICON NUMERAL_PRE_FORMS
!PNum/ngo+:nigo-                              NUMERAL_PRE_FORMS_GATEWAY "one";
!PNum/niizhoo+:niizhoo-                       NUMERAL_PRE_FORMS_GATEWAY "two";
!PNum/nso+:niso-                              NUMERAL_PRE_FORMS_GATEWAY "three";
!PNum/niiwoo+:niiwoo-                         NUMERAL_PRE_FORMS_GATEWAY "four";
!PNum/naano+:naano-                           NUMERAL_PRE_FORMS_GATEWAY "five";
!PNum/ngodwaasoo+:ningodwaasoo-                NUMERAL_PRE_FORMS_GATEWAY "six (1+5)";
!PNum/niizhwaasoo+:niizhwaasoo-               NUMERAL_PRE_FORMS_GATEWAY "seven (2+5);
!PNum/nshwaasoo+:nishwaasoo-                  NUMERAL_PRE_FORMS_GATEWAY "eight (3+5);
!PNum/zhaangsoo+:zhaangasoo-                  NUMERAL_PRE_FORMS_GATEWAY "nine";
!PNum/mdaaso+:midaaso-                         NUMERAL_PRE_FORMS_GATEWAY "ten (?+5)";
!
!LEXICON NUMERAL_PRE_FORMS_GATEWAY
!!risky to run nouns and verbs through the same gateway. there are a lot of preverbs that would then be able to concatenate with nouns.
!!instead, just put the numerical preverbs/prenouns in the lexica for nouns and verbs separately. 
!        V_REDUPLICATION_STEM ; 
!        NOUNS ; 

LEXICON DISTRIBUTIVES
Redup+:CRED1e     CARDINALS ; 
                    CARDINALS ; 

LEXICON CARDINALS
ngod+Num:ningod     CARDINALS_HUNDREDS ;
niish+Num:niizh     CARDINALS_HUNDREDS ;
nswi+Num:nis     CARDINALS_HUNDREDS ;
niiwin+Num:nii     CARDINALS_HUNDREDS ;
naanan+Num:naan     CARDINALS_HUNDREDS ;
ngodwaaswi+Num:ningodwaas     CARDINALS_HUNDREDS ;
niizhwaaswi+Num:niizhwaas     CARDINALS_HUNDREDS ;
nshwaaswi+Num:nishwaas   CARDINALS_HUNDREDS ;
zhaangswi+Num:zhaangas   CARDINALS_HUNDREDS ;
mdwaaswi+Num:midwaas    CARDINALS_HUNDREDS ;
                        CARDINALS_TENS ; 
                        CARDINAL_REPETITION_GATEWAY ; 
dshi+Num:dach          NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_VERBISH;
dshi+Num:dash          NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_VERBISH;
dshi+Num:nach          NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_VERBISH;


LEXICON CARDINALS_HUNDREDS  
+waak+Num:waak   CARDINALS_HUNDREDS_SHI ;

LEXICON CARDINALS_HUNDREDS_SHI
+shi+Conj+:-ashi-    CARDINALS_HUNDREDS_AABTA ; 
@D.NUMERAL.VERB@     # ; 

LEXICON CARDINALS_HUNDREDS_AABTA
aabta+Num:aabita    CLOSED_PROTECTION ; 
                    CARDINALS_TENS ; 

LEXICON CARDINALS_TENS
!NO BEZHIG/NGOD HERE
niish+Num+mdana+Num:niizhidana   CARDINALS_TENS_SHI; 
nswi+Num:nis                     CARDINALS_TENS_MIDANA; 
niiwin+Num:nii                   CARDINALS_TENS_MIDANA; 
naanan+Num:naan                  CARDINALS_TENS_MIDANA; 
ngodwaaswi+Num:ningodwaas        CARDINALS_TENS_MIDANA; 
niizhwaaswi+Num:niizhwaas        CARDINALS_TENS_MIDANA; 
nshwaaswi+Num:nishwaas           CARDINALS_TENS_MIDANA; 
zhaangswi+Num:zhaangas           CARDINALS_TENS_MIDANA; 
mdaaswi+Num:midaaswi             CARDINALS_TENS_SHI;
shi+Conj+:ashi-                  CARDINAL_REPETITION_GATEWAY; !short form of -teen words
                                 CARDINAL_REPETITION_GATEWAY; 
!REPETITION VERSIONS OF 10
mdaaswi+Num:midaas               NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_ELABORATION_GATEWAY;
mdaaswi+Num:midaach              NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_ELABORATION_GATEWAY;

LEXICON CARDINALS_TENS_MIDANA
+mdana+Num:%>midana               CARDINALS_TENS_SHI; 


LEXICON CARDINALS_TENS_SHI
+shi+Conj+:-ashi-    CARDINAL_REPETITION_GATEWAY ;
+shi+Conj+:-ashi-    V_PREVERBS_COUNTING ; !this may not be the right way to do it, but it seemed like we should have the possibility of making complex numerical preverbs (which need to end in the ones column with a preverb form)
@D.NUMERAL.VERB@     CLOSED_PROTECTION ; 

LEXICON CARDINAL_REPETITION_GATEWAY
@D.NUMERAL.VERB@ CARDINALS_ONE_NINE ; 
                REPETITION_ONE_NINE ; 

LEXICON REPETITION_ONE_NINE
ngod+Num:ningod     NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_ELABORATION_GATEWAY ;
niish+Num:niizh     NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_ELABORATION_GATEWAY ;
nswi+Num:nis     NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_ELABORATION_GATEWAY ;
niiwin+Num:niiw     NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_ELABORATION_GATEWAY ; !this w needs to be there for repetition -ing form, also niiwgon'gizid
naanan+Num:naan     NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_ELABORATION_GATEWAY ;
ngodwaaswi+Num:ningodwaach     NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_ELABORATION_GATEWAY ;
niizhwaaswi+Num:niizhwaach    NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_ELABORATION_GATEWAY ;
nshwaaswi+Num:nishwaach   NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_ELABORATION_GATEWAY ;
zhaangswi+Num:zhaangach   NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_ELABORATION_GATEWAY ; 

LEXICON CARDINALS_ONE_NINE
bezhig+Num:bezhig               # "one";
niish+Num:niizh                 # "two";
nswi+Num:niswi                  CLOSED_PROTECTION "three";
niiwin+Num:niiwin               # "four";
naanan+Num:naanan               # "five";
!naanin:naanin               # "five";
ngodwaaswi+Num:ningodwaaswi     CLOSED_PROTECTION "six";
niizhwaaswi+Num:niizhwaaswi     CLOSED_PROTECTION "seven";
nshwaaswi+Num:nishwaaswi        CLOSED_PROTECTION "eight";
zhaangswi+Num:zhaangaswi        CLOSED_PROTECTION "nine";

LEXICON NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_ELABORATION_GATEWAY
                 NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_VERBISH ;
                 NUMERAL_FINALS ;
@D.NUMERAL.VERB@  NUMERAL_CLASSIFICATORY_MEDIALS ; !these aren't verbs afaik, so don't go putting eko- in front of them
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!OLD VERSION
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NUMERALS_META_GATEWAY
        NUMERAL_ROOTS_GATEWAY ; 
        DISTRIBUTIVE_REDUPLICATION ; 

LEXICON NUMERAL_ROOTS_GATEWAY
        !need to allow person prefixes just in case you end up with a VAI suffix, but not in any other cases
        NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_ONE ; 
        NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_EXCEPTIONAL_ONE ; 
        NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_TWO_NINE ; 
        NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_TEN ; 
@D.Person@        NUMERAL_STANDALONE_FORMS_TEN ; !you should not ever have person prefixes on standalone numerals
@D.Person@        NUMERAL_STANDALONE_FORMS_LESS_THAN_TEN ;
@R.NUMERAL.HUNDRED@@D.NUMERAL.TEN@  NUMERAL_HALF ; 

!LEXICON ORDINALS_SET
!@P.NUMERAL.ORD@ NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_TWO_NINE ;  !used to ensure ordinals end in repetitions. currently repetitions are limited to simple roots, can't build a more complex numeral (and so it is also impossible to build a more complex ordinal)
!@P.NUMERAL.ORD@ NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_TEN ; 


LEXICON NUMERAL_HALF
aabta+Num:aabita     CLOSED_PROTECTION "half"; 

LEXICON NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_EXCEPTIONAL_ONE
bezhig+Num:bezhigw6 NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_VERBISH ; 

LEXICON NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_ONE
ngod+Num:ningod2           NUMERAL_STEM_HUNDRED_GET "one"; !can't combine with mdana (10), can combine with waak (100). ordinal form is ntam (with just e-, not eko-)

LEXICON NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_TEN
mdaas+Num:midaa          NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_TEN_GET "ten"; !mdaas everywhere except repetition forms (and thus ordinals as well, then mdaas/mdaach. can't combine with mdana, can combine with waak

LEXICON NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_TEN_GET
@D.NUMERAL.ORD@ NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_TEN_S ; 
                NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_TEN_S_CH ; 

LEXICON NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_TEN_S
0:s         NUMERAL_STEM_HUNDRED_GET ;

LEXICON NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_TEN_S_CH
0:s         NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_VERBISH ; 
0:ch        NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_VERBISH ; 

LEXICON NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_TWO_NINE
niish+Num:niizh             NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_GET_TWO "two";        !20 is niizhdana (no m), otherwise regular
nis+Num:nis                 NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_35_GATEWAY "three";   !fully regular
nii+Num:nii                 NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_FOUR_GATEWAY "four";  !nii everywhere, except in repetition form, then niiwing
!naan+:naanan           NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_35_GATEWAY "five";    !have not seen this variant, but it was mercurially listed in valentine 2001:874
naan+Num:naan               NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_35_GATEWAY "five";    !fully regular
ngodwaas+Num:ningodwaa     NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_SIX_NINE_GATEWAY "six"; !ngodwaas everywhere but repetition forms (and thus ordinals as well), then ngodwaach
niizhwaas+Num:niizhwaa     NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_SIX_NINE_GATEWAY "seven"; !niizhwaas everywhere but repetition forms (and thus ordinals as well), then niizhwaach
nshwaas+Num:nishwaa        NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_SIX_NINE_GATEWAY "eight"; !nshwaas everywhere but repetition forms (and thus ordinals as well), then nshwaach
zhaangs+Num:zhaanga        NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_SIX_NINE_GATEWAY "nine"; !zhaangs everywhere but repetition forms (and thus ordinals as well), then zhaangch

LEXICON NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_35_GATEWAY
                    NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_VERBISH ; 
                    NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_GET ; 

LEXICON NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_FOUR_GATEWAY
0:w                 NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_VERBISH ; 
                    NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_GET ; 

LEXICON NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_SIX_NINE_GATEWAY
0:s                 NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_GET  ; 
0:ch                NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_VERBISH ; 

LEXICON NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_VERBISH
+VII:in VII_ORDERS_GET ; !ordinals, repetition forms take +Cnj+0:g, presumably full on verbs of number can take the full suite. person prefixes will not be legitimate here because VII_ORDERS_GET rules them out
+VAI:i  VAI_ORDERS_GET ; !first and second person prefixes need to be routed here too

LEXICON NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_GET_TWO
                                        NUMERAL_CLASSIFICATORY_MEDIALS ; 
                                        NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_VERBISH ; 
@D.NUMERAL.ORD@@D.NUMERAL.TEN@         NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_TWO_TENS ; 
@D.NUMERAL.ORD@@D.NUMERAL.HUNDRED@     NUMERAL_STEM_HUNDRED_SET ; 

LEXICON NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_GET
@D.NUMERAL.ORD@@D.NUMERAL.TEN@         NUMERAL_STEM_TEN_SET ; 
@D.NUMERAL.ORD@@D.NUMERAL.HUNDRED@     NUMERAL_STEM_HUNDRED_SET ;
                                        NUMERAL_CLASSIFICATORY_MEDIALS ; 
                                        NUMERAL_FINALS ; 

LEXICON NUMERAL_STEM_TEN_SET  
@P.NUMERAL.TEN@     NUMERAL_STEM_TEN ;

LEXICON NUMERAL_ROOT_FORMS_TWO_TENS
+mdana+Num:%>dana     NUMERAL_STANDALONE_FORMS_TEN_GATEWAY ; !need to trigger epenthesis when it is CC

LEXICON NUMERAL_STEM_TEN
+mdana+Num:%>midana     NUMERAL_STANDALONE_FORMS_TEN_GATEWAY ; !need to trigger epenthesis when it is CC

LEXICON NUMERAL_STEM_HUNDRED_GET
@D.NUMERAL.HUNDRED@ NUMERAL_STEM_HUNDRED_SET ;

LEXICON NUMERAL_STEM_HUNDRED_SET
@P.NUMERAL.HUNDRED@ NUMERAL_STEM_HUNDRED ;

LEXICON NUMERAL_STEM_HUNDRED
+waak+Num:waak     NUMERAL_STANDALONE_FORMS_HUNDRED_GATEWAY ; 

LEXICON NUMERAL_STANDALONE_FORMS_HUNDRED_GATEWAY 
    # ; 
+shi+Conj+:-ashi-    NUMERAL_ROOTS_GATEWAY ; 

LEXICON DISTRIBUTIVE_REDUPLICATION
Redup+:CRED1e     DISTRIBUTIVE_REDUPLICATION_GATEWAY ; 
                    DISTRIBUTIVE_REDUPLICATION_GATEWAY ; 

LEXICON DISTRIBUTIVE_REDUPLICATION_GATEWAY
!this can also occur using roots in verbs (nen'godooshkne, nen'godwaasooshkne) (nenaannooshkne is not a root, would be naan)
        NUMERAL_STANDALONE_FORMS_LESS_THAN_TEN ;
        NUMERAL_STANDALONE_FORMS_TEN ;

LEXICON NUMERAL_STANDALONE_FORMS_LESS_THAN_TEN
bezhik+Num:bezhig               # "one";
niish+Num:niizh                 # "two";
nswi+Num:niswi                  CLOSED_PROTECTION "three";
niiwin+Num:niiwin               # "four";
naanan+Num:naanan               # "five";
!naanin:naanin               # "five";
ngodwaaswi+Num:ningodwaaswi     CLOSED_PROTECTION "six";
niizhwaaswi+Num:niizhwaaswi     CLOSED_PROTECTION "seven";
nshwaaswi+Num:nishwaaswi        CLOSED_PROTECTION "eight";
zhaangswi+Num:zhaangaswi        CLOSED_PROTECTION "nine";

LEXICON NUMERAL_STANDALONE_FORMS_TEN !THIS NEEDS TO BE CONNECTED UPSTREAM
mdaaswi+Num:midaaswi             NUMERAL_STANDALONE_FORMS_TEN_GATEWAY ;

LEXICON NUMERAL_STANDALONE_FORMS_TEN_GATEWAY 
    CLOSED_PROTECTION ; 
+shi+Conj+:-ashi-    NUMERAL_STANDALONE_FORMS_LESS_THAN_TEN ; !form numbers X1-X9
